Nebraska, session 109, LB655.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB655 LB655
2025 2025
Section 1. It is the intent of the Legislature to provide the right
of medical conscience for health care providers and payors to ensure they
are able to provide care for patients in a manner consistent with their
moral, ethical, and religious convictions. Further, it is the intent of
the Legislature that licensed health care providers and payors be free
from threat of discrimination for providing conscience-based health care.
Sec. 2. For purposes of sections 1 to 7 of this act:
(1) Adverse action means the discharge, transfer, demotion,
discipline, suspension, exclusion, revocation of privileges, withholding
of bonuses, or reduction in salary or benefits, any action that may
negatively impact the advancement or graduation of a student, including,
but not limited to, the withholding of scholarship funds, or any other
disciplinary or retaliatory action taken against a health care provider;
(2) Conscience-based objection means an objection based on a
sincerely held religious, moral, or ethical belief. Conscience with
respect to entities is determined by reference to the entities' governing
documents, any published ethical, moral, or religious guidelines or
directives, mission statements, constitutions, articles of incorporation,
bylaws, policies, or regulations;
(3) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;
(4) Educational institution means a public or private school,
college, or university;
(5) Health care payor means a health insurer, an employer, a health
care sharing organization, a health plan, a health maintenance
organization, a management services organization, or any other entity
that pays for, or arranges for the payment of, a health care service,
whether such payment is in whole or in part;
(6) Health care provider has the same meaning as defined in section
71-7907. A health care provider includes any student enrolled in an
educational institution who is seeking to become a health care provider;
(7) Health care service means medical research, medical procedures,
-2-

LB655 LB655
2025 2025
or medical services, including, but not limited to, testing, diagnosis,
referral, dispensing or administering a drug, medication, or device,
psychological therapy or counseling, research, therapy, record-making
procedures, set-up or performance of a surgery or procedure, or any other
care or services performed or provided by any health care provider;
(8) Participate or participation means to pay for, or take part in
any way, in providing or facilitating any health care service or any part
of such service; and
(9) Right of medical conscience means the right of a health care
provider or health care payor to abide by sincerely held religious,
moral, or ethical beliefs. With respect to health care providers or
payors that are entities, such beliefs are determined by reference to the
entities' governing documents, any published ethical, moral, or religious
guidelines or directives, mission statements, constitutions, articles of
incorporation, bylaws, policies, or regulations.
Sec. 3. (1) A health care provider or health care payor has the
right to opt out of participation in, or payment for, any health care
service if the provider or payor has a conscience-based objection to
participation in the health care service. A health care provider shall,
at the time of the conscience-based objection, or as soon as practicable
thereafter, provide written notice of the provider's conscience-based
objection to the health care provider's supervisor or employer and
document the conscience-based objection to the health care service in the
patient's medical file. Additionally, if a patient, or potential patient
when attempting to schedule an appointment with the provider, indicates
to the provider that the patient is seeking a specific health care
service for which the provider has a conscience-based objection, the
provider shall notify the patient or potential patient that the provider
does not provide such service prior to scheduling the appointment. A
health care provider who is a student shall provide written notice of the
student's conscience-based objection to the educational institution at
-3-

LB655 LB655
2025 2025
the time the conscience-based objection is made or as soon as practicable
thereafter.
(2) The exercise of the right of medical conscience is limited to a
conscience-based objection to a specific health care service. This
section shall not be construed to (a) waive or modify any duty a health
care provider or health care payor may have to provide or pay for other
health care services that do not violate the provider's or payor's right
of medical conscience, (b) waive or modify any duty to provide any
informed consent required by law, or (c) allow a health care provider or
payor to opt out of providing health care services to any patient or
potential patient because of that patient's or potential patient's race,
color, religion, sex, or national origin. Additionally, a health care
payor shall not deny payment for a health care service that it is
contractually obligated to cover during a plan year.
(3) A health care provider shall not be discriminated against or
suffer adverse action because the health care provider declined to
participate in a health care service on the basis of a conscience-based
objection.
Sec. 4. (1) A health care provider or health care payor may not be
discriminated against or suffer any adverse action in any manner with
respect to:
(a) Providing or causing to be provided, or intending to provide or
cause to be provided, information relating to a violation of sections 1
to 7 of this act, or an act or omission the health care provider or
health care payor reasonably believes to be a violation of a provision of
sections 1 to 7 of this act, to the provider or payor's employer, the
Attorney General, the department, any other state agency charged with
protecting the right of medical conscience, the United States Department
of Health and Human Services, the Office for Civil Rights, or any other
federal agency charged with protecting the right of medical conscience;
(b) Testifying or intending to testify in a proceeding concerning
-4-

LB655 LB655
2025 2025
such violation; or
(c) Assisting or participating in or intending to assist or
participate in such a proceeding.
(2) Unless the disclosure is specifically prohibited by law, a
health care provider or health care payor shall not be discriminated
against in any manner for disclosing information that the health care
provider or health care payor reasonably believes constitutes a (a)
violation of any law, rule, or regulation, (b) violation of any ethical
guidelines for the provision of any medical procedure or service, or (c)
practice or method of treatment that may put patient health at risk or
present a substantial and specific danger to public health or safety.
Sec. 5. A health care provider or health care payor may file a
complaint with the Attorney General alleging any violation of sections 1
to 7 of this act. If the Attorney General determines there has been a
violation of sections 1 to 7 of this act, the Attorney General may
commence a civil action for damages, injunctive relief, or any other
appropriate relief, including attorney's fees. For the purpose of
conducting an investigation, the Attorney General may administer oaths,
take depositions, make inspections when authorized by law, issue
subpoenas supported by affidavit, serve subpoenas and other process, and
compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, papers,
documents, and other evidence. The Attorney General may adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations to implement this section.
Sec. 6. (1) A health care provider or health care payor shall not
be held civilly liable solely for declining to participate in, or pay
for, a health care service when such provider or payor has a conscience-
based objection. However, this section does not limit a person's ability
to recover damages or other relief under any other applicable law for a
denial of care for any other reason that is not a conscience-based
objection.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to override any
-5-

LB655 LB655
2025 2025
requirement to provide emergency medical treatment in accordance with
state law or the Emergency Medical Treatment and Active Labor Act, 42
U.S.C. 1395dd.
Sec. 7. Disciplinary action shall not be instituted against a
health care provider's license solely because the health care provider
has spoken or written publicly about a health care service or public
policy, including, but not limited to, speech through the use of a social
media platform, if the health care provider is not using such speech or
written communication to provide medical advice or treatment to a patient
and if such speech or written communication does not separately violate
any other applicable law or rule.
-6-